District of Columbia statutes.
7-1005

Discrimination in employment prohibited.

The blind and other persons with physical disabilities shall be employed by: (1) every individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation, or the receiver, trustee, or successor thereof (exclusive of the government of the United States or any agency thereof), doing business, and employing any individual for the purpose of such business, in the District of Columbia; and (2) the government of the District of Columbia, the Board of Education of the District of Columbia, the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, the Board of Higher Education of the District of Columbia, and the Executive Officer of the District of Columbia courts, and all other employers supported in whole or in part by appropriations for the District of Columbia, on the same terms and conditions as the able-bodied, unless it is shown that the particular disability prevents the performance of the work involved.

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 971, Pub. L. 92-515, § 4
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 25(c), 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “other persons with physical disabilities” for “the otherwise physically disabled”.
1973 Ed., § 6-1504.
1981 Ed., § 6-1705.
This section is referenced in § 7-1007.